Hawaii statutes.
§806-9 Information, laws applicable.
All provisions of law applying to prosecutions upon indictments, to writs and
process therein, and the issuing and service thereof, to motions, pleadings,
trials, and punishments, or the passing or execution of any sentence, and to
all proceedings in cases of indictment, whether in the court of original or
appellate jurisdiction, shall in the same manner and to the same extent as near
as may be, apply to information and all prosecutions and proceedings thereon.
[L 1903, c 39, §5; RL 1925, §4020; RL 1935, §5493; RL 1945, §10794; RL 1955,
§258-5; HRS §711-9; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Need not be verified. 23 H. 250, 253 (1916).

Form and content of information. 36 H. 550 (1943), aff'd 150
F.2d 545 (1945).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next